Maine, session 132, LD292.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
CONCEPT DRAFT
SUMMARY
This bill is a concept draft pursuant to Joint Rule 208.
This bill proposes to implement the recommendations of the automotive right to repair
working group convened by Resolve 2023, chapter 171.
Page 1 - 132LR2054(01)